Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202618-2123
Undeveloped vacant land; acquisition, when.

Upon a determination, by resolution, of the governing body of the city in which such land is located, that the acquisition and development of undeveloped vacant land, not within a substandard and blighted area, is essential to the proper clearance or redevelopment of substandard and blighted areas or a necessary part of the general community redevelopment program of the city, the acquisition, planning, and preparation for development or disposal of such land shall constitute a redevelopment project which may be undertaken by the authority in the manner provided in the Community Development Law.

Laws 1951, c. 224, § 9, p. 810;

R.R.S.1943, § 14-1623;

Laws 1957, c. 52, § 13, p. 259;

Laws 1961, c. 61, § 12, p. 238;

R.R.S.1943, § 19-2623;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 134;

Laws 2026, LB1114, § 79.
July 18, 2026